District of Columbia statutes.
26-831.22

Rules.

The Commissioner may prescribe rules governing the activities of merchant banks and implementing this chapter pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2. The rules shall take into account the objective of merchant banks to provide needed capital to businesses and the nondepository nature of merchant banks.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 322, 48 DCR 3244

History

Financial institutions organized under federal law, application of District law, see § 26-710.
Secured transactions, sales of accounts and chattel paper, security interest, attachment and enforceability, transactions remain subject to this chapter, see § 28:9-203.

Cross References